Vermont, session 2025-2026, H538.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS
The General Assembly finds:
(1) Standard time approximates natural solar time.
(2) Changing clocks twice a year is personally disruptive and neither a
healthy nor safe activity.
(3) Many biologists, endocrinology immunologists, psychologists, and
scientists in other disciplines; child advocates; and teachers believe that standard
time provides the best conditions for individual learning, mental and physical
well-being, personal safety, and productivity.
VT LEG #385600 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.538
2026 Page 2 of 3
Sec. 2. 1 V.S.A. § 431 is amended to read:
§ 431. STANDARD TIME; DAYLIGHT SAVING TIME
(a) The standard time within the State of Vermont shall be based on the
mean astronomical time of 75° of longitude west from Greenwich, known and
designated as “U.S. Eastern Standard Time,.” except as provided in 15 U.S.C.
§ 260a, when standard time shall be advanced one hour. The period of time so
advanced may be called “daylight saving time.”
(b) The Governor is authorized to shorten or lengthen the period specified
in subsection (a) of this section by proclamation, if necessary to make the time
accord with the time in effect in any of the states whose boundaries adjoin
Vermont. This proclamation shall be issued at least 10 days before it takes
effect. [Repealed.]
Sec. 3. TRANSITION TO YEAR-ROUND U.S. EASTERN STANDARD
TIME
The transition to the observance of year-round U.S. Eastern Standard Time
shall occur on January 1 in the year following the enactment of year-round
U.S. Eastern Standard Time in the states of Massachusetts, New Hampshire,
and New York in accordance with 15 U.S.C. § 260a.
VT LEG #385600 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.538
2026 Page 3 of 3
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATES AND TRANSITION
This section and Secs. 1 (findings) and 3 (transition to year-round U.S.
Eastern Standard Time) shall take effect on July 1, 2026, and Sec. 2 (standard
time) shall take effect in accordance with the provisions set forth in Sec. 3.
VT LEG #385600 v.1